fr: Type de numéro de série du billet de banque: Binaire; En serre-livres; Fantaisie (autre); Numéro de série élevé; En échelle / ascendant; En échelle / descendant; Numéro de série bas; Sans numéro de série; Radar / palindrome; À répétition; Billet de remplacement / Billet étoilé; Numéro de série non visible; Numéro de série plein (tous les chiffres identiques); Standard; Autre
fi: Setelin sarjanumeron tyyppi: Binäärinen; Kirjatuki; Erikoisarjanumero (muu); Korkea sarjanumero; Nouseva sarja; Laskeva sarja; Matala sarjanumero; Ei sarjanumeroa; Tutka/palindromi; Toistuva; Korvaava seteli / tähtiseteli; Sarjanumero ei näkyvissä; Yhtenäinen sarjanumero (kaikki numerot samoja); Vakio; Muu
cs: Typ sériového čísla bankovky: Binární; Bookend; Speciální (jiné); Vysoké sériové číslo; Postupka / vzestupná; Postupka / sestupná; Nízké sériové číslo; Bez sériového čísla; Radar / palindrom; Opakující se; Náhradní bankovka / bankovka s hvězdičkou; Sériové číslo není viditelné; Jednolité sériové číslo (všechny číslice stejné); Standardní; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de número de série da nota: Binário; Extremos iguais; Especial (outro); Número de série alto; Escada/ascendente; Escada/descendente; Número de série baixo; Sem número de série; Radar/capicua; Repetidor; Nota de substituição/nota estrela; Número de série não visível; Número de série sólido (todos os algarismos iguais); Padrão; Outro
ru: Тип серийного номера банкноты: Бинарный; Букэнд; Особый номер (другое); Высокий серийный номер; Лесенка / по возрастанию; Лесенка / по убыванию; Низкий серийный номер; Без серийного номера; Радар / палиндром; Повторяющийся; Банкнота замещения / банкнота со звездочкой; Серийный номер не виден; Сплошной серийный номер (все цифры одинаковые); Стандартный; Другое
vi: Loại số sê-ri tiền giấy: Nhị phân; Đối xứng đầu cuối; Số đẹp (khác); Số sê-ri cao; Tiến lên / Tăng dần; Lùi xuống / Giảm dần; Số sê-ri thấp; Không có số sê-ri; Radar / Palindrome; Lặp lại; Tiền thay thế / Tiền sao; Không thấy số sê-ri; Số sê-ri đồng nhất (tất cả chữ số giống nhau); Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de número de série da cédula: Binário; Bookend; Especial (outro); Número de série alto; Escada / Crescente; Escada / Decrescente; Número de série baixo; Sem número de série; Radar / Palíndromo; Repetidor; Cédula de reposição / Cédula com estrela; Número de série não visível; Número de série sólido (todos os dígitos iguais); Padrão; Outro
it: Tipo di numero di serie della banconota: Binario; A specchio; Particolare (altro); Numero di serie alto; A scala / crescente; A scala / decrescente; Numero di serie basso; Nessun numero di serie; Radar / palindromo; Ripetuto; Banconota sostitutiva / Banconota star; Numero di serie non visibile; Numero di serie solido (tutte le cifre uguali); Standard; Altro
tr: Banknot seri numarası tipi: İkili; Kitap desteği; Süslü (diğer); Yüksek seri numarası; Merdiven / Artan; Merdiven / Azalan; Düşük seri numarası; Seri numarası yok; Radar / Palindrom; Tekrarlayan; Yedek banknot / Yıldız banknot; Seri numarası görünmüyor; Sabit seri numarası (tüm rakamlar aynı); Standart; Diğer
th: ประเภทหมายเลขซีเรียลธนบัตร: ไบนารี (เลขสองหลัก); บุ๊กเอนด์ (ตัวเลขหัวท้ายเหมือนกัน); แฟนซี (อื่นๆ); หมายเลขซีเรียลสูง; ตัวเลขเรียง / จากน้อยไปมาก; ตัวเลขเรียง / จากมากไปน้อย; หมายเลขซีเรียลต่ำ; ไม่มีหมายเลขซีเรียล; เรดาร์ / พาลินโดรม; ตัวเลขซ้ำ; ธนบัตรทดแทน / ธนบัตรดาว; มองไม่เห็นหมายเลขซีเรียล; หมายเลขซีเรียลตอง (ตัวเลขทั้งหมดเหมือนกัน); มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
nl: Bankbiljet serienummertype: Binair; Bookend; Speciaal (overig); Hoog serienummer; Ladder / Oplopend; Ladder / Aflopend; Laag serienummer; Geen serienummer; Radar / Palindroom; Repeater; Vervangingsbiljet / sterbiljet; Serienummer niet zichtbaar; Massief serienummer (alle cijfers hetzelfde); Standaard; Overig
nb: Type seddelserienummer: Binær; Bokstøtte; Spesielt (annet); Høyt serienummer; Stige / stigende; Stige / synkende; Lavt serienummer; Uten serienummer; Radar / palindrom; Gjentakelse; Erstatningsseddel / stjerneseddel; Serienummer ikke synlig; Ensartet serienummer (alle sifre er like); Standard; Annet
zh-TW: 紙幣序號類型: 雙數碼; 書立號; 趣味號 (其他); 大序號; 階梯號 / 遞增; 階梯號 / 遞減; 小序號; 無序號; 雷達號 / 迴文號; 循環號; 替換鈔票 / 補號鈔; 序號無法辨識; 全同號 (所有數字相同); 標準; 其他
el: Τύπος σειριακού αριθμού τραπεζογραμματίου: Δυαδικός; Bookend; Ιδιαίτερος (άλλο); Υψηλός σειριακός αριθμός; Σκάλα / Αύξων; Σκάλα / Φθίνων; Χαμηλός σειριακός αριθμός; Χωρίς σειριακό αριθμό; Ραντάρ / Παλίνδρομος; Επαναλαμβανόμενος; Χαρτονόμισμα αντικατάστασης / Χαρτονόμισμα με αστερίσκο; Μη ορατός σειριακός αριθμός; Σταθερός σειριακός αριθμός (ίδια ψηφία); Τυπικό; Άλλο
da: Type af serienummer på pengesedlen: Binær; Bogstøtte; Fancy (andet); Højt serienummer; Stige / Stigende; Stige / Faldende; Lavt serienummer; Intet serienummer; Radar / Palindrom; Gentager; Erstatningsseddel / stjerneseddel; Serienummer er ikke synligt; Ensartet serienummer (alle cifre er ens); Standard; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta serijskog broja novčanice: Binarni; Bookend; Zanimljivi (ostalo); Visoki serijski broj; Uzastopni / uzlazni; Uzastopni / silazni; Niski serijski broj; Bez serijskog broja; Radar / palindrom; Ponavljajući; Zamjenska novčanica / novčanica sa zvjezdicom; Serijski broj nije vidljiv; Jedinstven serijski broj (sve znamenke iste); Standardno; Ostalo
zh-CN: 纸币序列号类型: 二进制号; 书立号; 趣味号（其他）; 高位序列号; 阶梯号/递增; 阶梯号/递减; 低位序列号; 无序列号; 雷达号/回文号; 重复号; 补号钞 / 星号钞; 序列号不可见; 同号钞（所有数字相同）; 标准; 其他
ja: 紙幣のシリアル番号タイプ: バイナリ; ブックエンド; ファンシー (その他); 高いシリアル番号; ラダー / 昇順; ラダー / 降順; 低いシリアル番号; シリアル番号なし; レーダー / 回文; リピーター; 補充券/スターノート; シリアルナンバー非表示; ゾロ目 (すべての桁が同じ); 標準; その他
de: Typ der Banknotenseriennummer: Binär; Bookend; Fancy (sonstige); Hohe Seriennummer; Aufsteigend (Ladder); Absteigend (Ladder); Niedrige Seriennummer; Keine Seriennummer; Radar / Palindrom; Wiederholung (Repeater); Ersatznote / Sternnote; Seriennummer nicht sichtbar; Einheitliche Seriennummer (alle Ziffern gleich); Standard; Sonstige
hu: Bankjegy sorozatszámának típusa: Bináris; Könyvtámasz; Különleges (egyéb); Magas sorozatszám; Létra / növekvő; Létra / csökkenő; Alacsony sorozatszám; Nincs sorozatszám; Radar / palindrom; Ismétlődő; Pótló bankjegy / Csillagos bankjegy; A sorozatszám nem látható; Azonos számjegyű sorozatszám; Normál; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ sériového čísla bankovky: Binárne; Bookend; Ozdobné (iné); Vysoké sériové číslo; Postupné/vzostupné; Postupné/zostupné; Nízke sériové číslo; Bez sériového čísla; Radar/palindróm; Opakujúce sa; Náhradná bankovka/bankovka s hviezdičkou; Sériové číslo nie je viditeľné; Jednoliate sériové číslo (všetky číslice sú rovnaké); Štandardné; Iné
es: Tipo de número de serie del billete: Binario; Extremos iguales; Especial (otro); Número de serie alto; En escalera/ascendente; En escalera/descendente; Número de serie bajo; Sin número de serie; Radar/palíndromo; Repetidor; Billete de reemplazo / billete estrella; Número de serie no visible; Número de serie sólido (todos los dígitos iguales); Estándar; Otro
en: Banknote serial number type: Binary; Bookend; Fancy (other); High serial number; Ladder / Ascending; Ladder / Descending; Low serial number; No serial number; Radar / Palindrome; Repeater; Replacement note / Star note; Serial number not visible; Solid serial number (all digits same); Standard; Other
bg-BG: Вид сериен номер на банкнотата: Двоичен; С еднакви краища (bookend); Специален (друго); Висок сериен номер; Стълбица / възходящ; Стълбица / низходящ; Нисък сериен номер; Без сериен номер; Радар / палиндром; Повтарящ се (repeater); Банкнота заместител / Банкнота със звезда; Серийният номер не се вижда; Еднакъв сериен номер (всички цифри са еднакви); Стандартен; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta serijske številke bankovca: Binarna; Ujemanje na koncih (bookend); Posebna (drugo); Visoka serijska številka; Lestvica/naraščajoče; Lestvica/padajoče; Nizka serijska številka; Brez serijske številke; Radar/palindrom; Ponavljajoča; Nadomestni bankovec/bankovec z zvezdico; Serijska številka ni vidna; Enotna serijska številka (vse števke so enake); Standard; Drugo
ro-RO: Tipul numărului de serie al bancnotei: Binar; Extremități identice; Deosebit (altele); Număr de serie mare; Scară / Ascendent; Scară / Descendent; Număr de serie mic; Fără număr de serie; Radar / Palindrom; Repetitor; Bancnotă de înlocuire / Bancnotă cu stea; Număr de serie invizibil; Număr de serie uniform (toate cifrele identice); Standard; Altele
ko: 지폐 일련번호 유형: 바이너리; 북엔드; 팬시(기타); 높은 일련번호; 래더/오름차순; 래더/내림차순; 낮은 일련번호; 일련번호 없음; 레이더/회문; 리피터; 보충권 / 별표 지폐; 일련번호 보이지 않음; 솔리드 일련번호(모든 자릿수 동일); 표준; 기타
lt-LT: Banknoto serijos numerio tipas: Dvejetainis; Su vienodais skaičiais kraštuose; Neįprastas (kita); Didelis serijos numeris; Kopėčios / didėjantis; Kopėčios / mažėjantis; Mažas serijos numeris; Be serijos numerio; Radaras / palindromas; Pasikartojantis; Pakaitinis banknotas / banknotas su žvaigždute; Serijos numeris nematomas; Vienodas serijos numeris (visi skaitmenys vienodi); Standartinis; Kita
pl: Typ numeru seryjnego banknotu: Binarny; Bookend; Fantazyjny (inny); Wysoki numer seryjny; Schodki / rosnący; Schodki / malejący; Niski numer seryjny; Brak numeru seryjnego; Radar / palindrom; Repeater; Banknot zastępczy / z gwiazdką; Niewidoczny numer seryjny; Jednorodny numer seryjny (wszystkie cyfry takie same); Standardowy; Inne
sv: Typ av sedelserienummer: Binär; Bokstöd; Speciell (övrigt); Högt serienummer; Stege/stigande; Stege/fallande; Lågt serienummer; Utan serienummer; Radar/palindrom; Upprepande; Ersättningssedel/stjärnsedel; Serienummer ej synligt; Enhetligt serienummer (alla siffror är lika); Standard; Övrigt